District of Columbia statutes.
38-1907

Employment of substitutes for engineer, janitor, laborer, fireman, or caretaker; salary deductions.

In the event of the absence of any engineer, assistant engineer, janitor, assistant janitor, laborer, fireman, or caretaker at any time during school sessions the Board of Education is hereby authorized to appoint a substitute, who shall be paid the salary of the position in which employed, and the amount paid to such substitute shall be deducted from the salary of the absent employee.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 956, ch. 150, § 1
1981 Ed., § 31-1007.
1973 Ed., § 31-625.